Illinois, session 104th, HB4690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Sections 18-185 and 20-17 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)7    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 8may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 9used in this Division 5: 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 11All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 12States Department of Labor. 13    "Extension limitation" means (a) the lesser of 5% or the 14percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1512-month calendar year preceding the levy year or (b) the rate 16of increase approved by voters under Section 18-205. 17    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 19more inhabitants. 20    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 211-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 221991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 23only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of   HB4690- 2 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 2counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 4district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 5subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 6rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 7levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 8value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 9levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 10district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 11includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 12provided in Section 18-213. 13    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 14Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 15corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 16purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 17district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 18the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 20for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 21general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 22made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 23bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 24issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 25district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 26refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1,   HB4690- 3 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b11991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 2district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 3before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 4or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 5pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 6principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 7governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 8other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 9payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 10lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 11issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 12building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 13contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 14payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 15Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 16construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 17made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 18as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 19Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 20less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 21definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 22initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 23of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 24the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 25district that participates in the Special Education District 26of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement   HB4690- 4 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 2school district's share of the amounts required to be 3contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 4to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 5the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 6this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 7county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 8recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 9Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 10the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 11loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1217-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 13and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 14Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 15to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 16Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 17under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 18(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 19assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 20liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 21district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 22the Illinois Highway Code; (q) made under Section 4 of the 23Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 24to supplement existing funds for community mental health 25facilities and services, including facilities and services for 26the person with a developmental disability or a substance use   HB4690- 5 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1disorder; and (r) made for the payment of principal and 2interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 317-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 4those bonds; and (s) made for the purpose of maintaining, 5constructing, or replacing sanitary sewers and collected as 6part of the taxpayer's property tax bill under Section 20-17. 7    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 8this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 9districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 1018-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 11district and those special purpose extensions that are made 12annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 13extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 14or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 15referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 16or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 171, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 18principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 19those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 20taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 21to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 221995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 23district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 24before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 25or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 26pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or   HB4690- 6 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 2governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 3other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 4payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 5lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 6issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 7building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 8contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 9payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 10Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 11construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 12made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 13Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 14of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 15for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 16Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 17Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 18under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 19payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 20defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 21in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 22the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 23non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 24issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 25subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 26payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under   HB4690- 7 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 2for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by 3Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 4Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 5issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 6the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 7established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 8made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 9authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 10pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 11District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 12Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 13(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 14Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 15pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 16annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 17recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 18Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 19the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 20District for recreational programs for persons with 21disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 22Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 23firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 24Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 25under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 26(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section   HB4690- 8 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b117-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 2employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension 3and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 4School Code; (s) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental 5Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to supplement 6existing funds for community mental health facilities and 7services, including facilities and services for the person 8with a developmental disability or a substance use disorder; 9and (t) made for the payment of principal and interest on any 10bonds issued under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the 11School Code or to refund or continue to refund those bonds; and 12(u) made for the purpose of maintaining, constructing, or 13replacing sanitary sewers and collected as part of the 14taxpayer's property tax bill under Section 20-17. 15    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 16this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 17those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 18(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 19for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 20that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 21special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 22to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 23were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 24to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 25issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 26applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any   HB4690- 9 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 2to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 3date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 4taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 5pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 6continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 7referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 8is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 9on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 10taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 11pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 12date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 13taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 14levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 15government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 16interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 17the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 18all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 19payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 20lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 21issued by the commission before the date on which the 22referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 23is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 24due under installment contracts entered into before the date 25on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 26taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal   HB4690- 10 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 2Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 3the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 4(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 5obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 6referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 7bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 8Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 9interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 10the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 11airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 12installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 13before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 14a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 15fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 16persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 17District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 18Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 19fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 20the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 214-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 22district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 23bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 24(n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act to 25provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 26for community mental health facilities and services, including   HB4690- 11 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1facilities and services for the person with a developmental 2disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) made for the 3payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued under 4the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 5refund or continue to refund those bonds; and (p) made for the 6purpose of maintaining, constructing, or replacing sanitary 7sewers and collected as part of the taxpayer's property tax 8bill under Section 20-17. 9    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 10this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 11subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 12extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 13extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 14excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 15district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 16bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 17taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 18obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 19date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 20pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 21continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 22(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 23taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 24to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 251997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 26were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective   HB4690- 12 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 2pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 37, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 4of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 5the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 6payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 7only after the governing body of the unit of local government 8finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 9make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 10commission lease when the lease payments are for the 11retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 121997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 13building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 14contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 15date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 16and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 17Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 18the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 19(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 20obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 21referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 22bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 23Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 24interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 25the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 26airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed,   HB4690- 13 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 2before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 3a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 4fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 5persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 6District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 7Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 8fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 9the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 104-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made under Section 4 of 11the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds 12or to supplement existing funds for community mental health 13facilities and services, including facilities and services for 14the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 15disorder; and (n) made for the payment of principal and 16interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1717-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 18those bonds; and (o) made for the purpose of maintaining, 19constructing, or replacing sanitary sewers and collected as 20part of the taxpayer's property tax bill under Section 20-17. 21    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 22that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 231994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 24Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 25subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 26for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law   HB4690- 14 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 2districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 3of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 4constituting an extension for payment of principal and 5interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 6referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 7For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 81991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 9for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 10the park district without referendum (but not including 11excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 12for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 13of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 14without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 15bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 16that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 17constituting an extension for payment of principal and 18interest on bonds issued by the park district without 19referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 20A debt service extension base established or increased at any 21time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 2218-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 23of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 24this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 25lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 26Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the levy   HB4690- 15 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1year. The debt service extension base may be established or 2increased as provided under Section 18-212. "Excluded 3non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by Public Act 488-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park 5District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 6issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 7Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 8continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 9referendum. 10    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 11to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 12unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 13contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 14to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 15district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 16The extension for a special service area is not included in the 17aggregate extension. 18    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 19last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 2018-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 21levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 22Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 23base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 24adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 25levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 26counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used   HB4690- 16 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 2taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 3in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 4decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 5as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 6required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 7the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 8aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 9the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 10rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 11calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 12(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 13been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.14    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 152012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 16District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 17    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 18purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 19the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 20School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 21    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 222022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 23program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 24levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 25shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 26base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had   HB4690- 17 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 2    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 31-155. 4    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 5board of review or board of appeals action, of new 6improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 7parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 8that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 9equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 1017-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 11board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 12estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 13estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 14levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 15Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 16upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 17is complete, of any real property located within the 18boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 19reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 20or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 21counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 22IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 23additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 24in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 25board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 26assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas   HB4690- 18 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 2Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 3during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 4in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 5include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 6school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 7applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 8    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 9organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 10county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 11population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 12    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 13provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 14equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 15municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 16redevelopment project area previously established under the 17Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 18Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 19Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 20established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 21Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 22Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 23each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 24the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 25equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 26project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997   HB4690- 19 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 2rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 3the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 4assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 5increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 6area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 7established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 8Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 9under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 10Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 11Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 12equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 13lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 14redevelopment project area over and above the initial 15equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 16project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 17taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 18redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 19Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 20the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 21Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 22Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 23amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 24taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 25from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 26equalized assessed value of that real property before removal   HB4690- 20 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1from the redevelopment project area. 2    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 3rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 4preceding aggregate extension base times an amount equal to 5one plus the extension limitation defined in this Section and 6the denominator of which is the current year's equalized 7assessed value of all real property in the territory under the 8jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 9year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 10extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 11districts that reduced their extension for educational 12purposes pursuant to Section 18-206, the highest aggregate 13extension in any of the last 3 preceding levy years shall be 14used for the purpose of computing the limiting rate. The 15denominator shall not include new property or the recovered 16tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate decrease, or a 17limiting rate increase has been approved at an election held 18after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise applicable 19limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of the new rate 20or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate decrease, as the 21case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting rate increase, 22the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set forth in the 23proposition approved by the voters for each of the years 24specified in the proposition, after which the limiting rate of 25the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise provided. 26In the case of a taxing district that obtained referendum   HB4690- 21 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1approval for an increased limiting rate on March 20, 2012, the 2limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate that 3generates the approximate total amount of taxes extendable for 4that tax year, as set forth in the proposition approved by the 5voters; this rate shall be the final rate applied by the county 6clerk for the aggregate of all capped funds of the district for 7tax year 2012.8(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 9103-591, eff. 7-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    (35 ILCS 200/20-17 new)12    Sec. 20-17. Sanitary sewer taxes. Notwithstanding any 13other provision of law, a municipality that is authorized to 14levy and collect a tax for the purpose of maintaining, 15constructing, or replacing sanitary sewers may, by ordinance 16or resolution, provide that those taxes shall be collected on 17behalf of the municipality as part of the taxpayer's property 18tax bill. A copy of the ordinance or resolution adopted under 19this Section shall be transmitted to the county collector not 20more than 30 days after the ordinance or resolution is 21adopted. The sanitary sewer taxes shall appear as a separate 22line item on the taxpayer's property tax bill. Sanitary sewer 23taxes collected under this Section shall not be considered 24part of any taxing district's aggregate extension for the 25purpose of the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.   HB4690- 22 -LRB104 17724 HLH 31155 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.